Utah statutes.
31A-22-809.   Right of debtor to choose insurer.
When credit life insurance or credit accident and health insurance is required
as security for any indebtedness, the creditor shall inform the debtor of the
debtor's option to furnish the required insurance through existing policies of
insurance owned or controlled by the debtor or to procure and furnish the
required coverage through any insurer authorized to transact life or accident
and health insurance in Utah.
